Florida, session 2026, HB771.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (n) is added to subsection (2) of
section 934.03, Florida Statutes, to read:
934.03 Interception and disclosure of wire, oral, or
electronic communications prohibited.—
(2)
(n) It is lawful under this section and ss. 934.04-934.09
for a person to intercept and record an oral communication if
the person is a party to the communication and the person has
reasonable grounds to believe that the recording will capture
evidence of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28. A
recording authorized under this paragraph may be provided to a
law enforcement agency, an attorney, or a court for the purpose
of evidencing an act of domestic violence. Such recording may
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb771-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 771 2026
not be otherwise disseminated or shared.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb771-00